Mississippi, session 2026, HB1939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Department of Public Safety for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026............... $   3,529,925.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to the construction and furnishing of the Department of Public Safety headquarters. SECTION 2.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $   2,475,000.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to the Civil Action No. 25CI1:23-cv-00204-WLK settlement agreement. SECTION 3.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $   2,672,869.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of providing funding to counties in a proportional amount that would have been received through the Emergency Management Performance Grant (EMPG). SECTION 4.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi State Supreme Court - Administrative Office of Courts for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026............................................................... ................................................. $ 652,863.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to trial judge appointments. SECTION 5.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi State Supreme Court - Administrative Office of Courts for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026............................................................... ................................................. $ 143,709.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to payments of terminal leave. SECTION 6.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Administrative Office of Courts and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi State Supreme Court - Administrative Office of Courts for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $   4,000,000.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses related to court reporters and trial judge support staff. SECTION 7.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Department of Human Services for the period beginning upon passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027 $   6,000,000.00. This additional appropriation is made for the purpose of defraying the expense related to income verification software. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after passage.